Massachusetts, session 194th, H1069.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The department of conservation and recreation shall erect and maintain 4 suitable
markers in memory of 4 law enforcement officers who were killed in the line of duty. The
markers shall be similar in form to street signs, shall be placed on sidewalk land islands at the
locations near where each officer was killed, and shall each include the name of the officer and
the circumstances of their death, as follows:
(i) to be placed on 158 Blue Hills Parkway, northbound, in the Town of Milton in
memory of Patrolman Robert Dana, noting “On March 25, 1984, while conducting a traffic stop
in the Town of Milton on Blue Hills Parkway, Patrolman Dana was shot and fatally wounded.”;
(ii) to be placed on Blue Hills Parkway, northbound, at Parkway Crescent in the Town of
Milton in memory of Patrolman Robert Edmonds, noting “On December 23, 1936, while on
of 2

pursuit of a stolen vehicle on Blue Hills Parkway in the Town of Milton, Patrolman Edmonds
collided with a tree and subsequently succumbed to his injuries.”;
(iii) to be placed on Hillside street at Chickatawbut road in the Town of Milton in
memory of Patrolman Robert Stewart, noting “On February 8, 1913, while on mounted patrol,
Patrolman Stewart was thrown from his horse on Hillside Street in the Town of Milton.
Patrolman Stewart subsequently succumbed to his injuries.”;
(iv) to be placed near Fisherman’s Beach at Ponkapoag pond in the Town of Canton, in
memory of Patrolman William Mateer, noting “On January 10, 1909, while attempting to rescue
a fisherman who had fallen through the ice on Ponkapoag Pond in the Town of Canton, both
Patrolman Mateer and the fisherman drowned.”
of 2